Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 1. Foreclosure Sale
38-38-106.
Bid required - form of bid.

The holder of the evidence of debt or the attorney for the holder shall submit a bid setting forth the holder’s initial bid for the property that is received by the officer no later than 12 noon on the second business day prior to the date of sale as provided in this section. In addition, if the sale will be conducted electronically, the holder may also include a maximum bid for the property. The holder or the attorney for the holder need not personally attend the sale. If the sale will be conducted electronically and the holder has elected to include a maximum bid, the bid shall be increased electronically in increments incorporated in the electronic program used by the officer to conduct the electronic sale up to such maximum bid if one or more third parties submit competing bids for the property.

If the bid is not received by the officer by the deadline, the officer shall continue the sale for one week and shall announce or post a notice of the continuance at the time and place designated for the sale.

The holder of the evidence of debt shall submit a signed and acknowledged bid, or the attorney for the holder shall submit a signed bid, which must specify the following amounts, itemized in substantially the following categories and in substantially the following form:

BID

To: =rf

Public Trustee (or Sheriff) of the County (or City and County) of =hr3  , State of Colorado (hereinafter the “officer”).

Date: =hr8
=hr8  , whose mailing address is =hr8  , bids the sum of $ =hr2   in your Sale No. =hr2   to be held on the =hr3   day of =hr3  , 20=hr2  .
The following is an itemization of all amounts due the holder of the evidence of debt secured by the deed of trust or other lien being foreclosed.
Street address of property being
foreclosed, if known: ______________________________
Regular [ ] / default [ ] rate of interest as of the date of
sale: __________
(Inapplicable items may be omitted):
Amounts due under the evidence of debt:
Principal :u2160 $ :u2240 __________
Interest :u2240 __________
Late charges :u2240 __________
Allowable prepayment penalties
or premiums :u2240 __________
Other amounts due under the evidence of debt
(specify) :u2240 __________ =sr __________
:u2240 __________ =sr __________
Category subtotal: =sr $ __________
Other fees and costs advanced by the holder of evidence of
debt:
Property, general liability, and
casualty insurance :u2240 __________
Property inspections :u2240 __________
Appraisals :u2240 __________
Taxes and assessments :u2240 __________
Utility charges owed or incurred :u2240 __________
Owner association
assessment paid :u2240 __________
Permitted amounts paid on
prior liens :u2240 __________
Permitted lease payments :u2240 __________
Less impound/escrow account credit :u2240 __________
Plus impound/escrow account deficiency :u2240 __________
Other (describe) :u2240 __________
Category subtotal: =sr $ __________
Attorney fees and advances:
Attorney fees :u2240 __________
Title commitments and insurances or abstractor
charges :u2240 __________
Court docketing :u2240 __________
Statutory notice :u2240 __________
Postage :u2240 __________
Electronic transmissions :u2240 __________
Photocopies :u2240 __________
Telephone :u2240 __________
Other (describe) :u2240 __________
Category subtotal: :u3080 $ __________
Officer fees and costs:
Officer statutory fee :u2240 __________
Publication charges :u2240 __________
Certificate of purchase
recording fee :u2240 __________
Confirmation deed fee :u2240 __________
Confirmation deed
recording fee :u2240 __________
Other (describe) :u2240 __________
Category subtotal: =sr $ __________
Total due holder of the evidence of debt :u2240 __________
:u1440 Initial Bid :u2160 $ :u2240 __________
:u1440 Deficiency :u2160 $ :u2240 __________
I enclose herewith the following:
1. Order authorizing sale.
2. Check (if applicable) to your order in the sum of $ _______________
covering the balance of your fees and costs.
3. Other:
_______________ .
Please send us the following:
1. Promissory note with the deficiency, if any, noted thereon
2. Refund for overpayment of officer’s fees and costs, if any
3. Other:
_______________ .
:u1880 Name of the holder of the evidence of debt
:u1880 and the attorney for the holder:
:u1880 Holder: =rf
:u1880 Attorney: =rf
:u1880 By: =rf
:u1880 Attorney registration number: =rf
:u1880 Attorney address: =rf
:u1880 Attorney business telephone: =rf

Upon receipt of the initial bid from the holder of the evidence of debt or the attorney for the holder, the officer shall make such information available to the general public.

The officer shall enter the bid by reading the bid amount set forth on the bid and the name of the person that submitted the bid or by posting or providing such bid information at the time and place designated for sale.

Bids submitted pursuant to this section may be amended by the holder of the evidence of debt or the attorney for the holder in writing or electronically, as determined by the officer pursuant to section 38-38-112, no later than 12 noon the day prior to the sale, or orally at the time of sale if the person amending the bid is physically present at the sale or electronically during the sale if the sale is conducted by means of the internet or another electronic medium. A bid submitted pursuant to this section may be modified orally at the time of sale if the person making the modification modifies and reexecutes the bid at the sale.

The holder of the evidence of debt or the attorney for the holder shall bid at least the holder’s good faith estimate of the fair market value of the property being sold, less the amount of unpaid real property taxes and all amounts secured by liens against the property being sold that are senior to the deed of trust or other lien being foreclosed and less the estimated reasonable costs and expenses of holding, marketing, and selling the property, net of income received; except that the holder or the attorney for the holder need not bid more than the total amount due to the holder as specified in the bid pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. The failure of the holder to bid the amount required by this subsection (6) shall not affect the validity of the sale but may be raised as a defense by any person sued on a deficiency.

Other than a bid by the holder of the evidence of debt not exceeding the total amount due shown on the bid pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the payment of any bid amount at sale must be received by the officer no later than the date and time of the sale, or at an alternative time after the sale and on the day of the sale, as specified in writing by the officer. The payment must be in the form specified in section 38-37-108. If the officer has not received full payment of the bid amount from the highest bidder at the sale pursuant to this subsection (7), the next highest bidder who has timely tendered the full amount of the bid under this subsection (7) is deemed the successful bidder at the sale.

If the holder of the evidence of debt is the highest bidder with a bid that exceeds the total amount due shown on the bid pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the holder of the evidence of debt is only required to pay the excess of the amount bid over the amount due the holder of the evidence of debt, as shown on the bid submitted pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

The officer may establish written policies relating to all aspects of the foreclosure sale that are consistent with the provisions of this article. The written policies shall be made available to the general public.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1658, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 91:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1922, § 54, effective June 1.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 1339, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1452, § 12, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2007:

(5) amended, p. 1834, § 10, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2009:

(2) and (7) amended,(HB 09-1207), ch. 164, p. 712, § 9, effective September 1.

L. 2012:

(1) and (2) amended,(SB 12-030), ch. 96, p. 318, § 8, effective September 1.

L. 2015:

(1), (2), and (5) amended,(HB 15-1142), ch. 113, p. 339, § 4, effective September 1.

L. 2018:

(2) and (7)(a) amended,(HB 18-1254), ch. 138, p. 903, § 4, effective August 8.

Editor’s note:

(1) This section is similar to former § 38-37-142, as it existed prior to 1990.

(2) The effective date for amendments made to this section by chapter 305, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2006, was changed from July 1, 2007, to January 1, 2008, by section 27 of chapter 404, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2007. (See L. 2007, p. 1849.)

38-38-107.
Fees and costs - definitions.

All fees and costs of every kind and nature incurred under the provisions of articles 37 to 39 of this title shall be fees and costs of the sale chargeable as additional amounts owing under the deed of trust or other lien being foreclosed. The amounts shall be deducted from the proceeds of any sale, or, if there are not cash proceeds from a sale adequate to pay such amounts, to the extent of the inadequacy, the amounts shall be paid by the holder of the evidence of debt. The officer may decline to issue the confirmation deed pursuant to section 38-38-501 until all sums due to the officer have been paid.

(Deleted by amendment,

L

. 2006, p. 1455, § 13;

L

. 2007, p. 1849, § 27, effective January 1, 2008.)

Fees and costs include but are not limited to the following amounts that have been paid or incurred:

Costs and expenses allowable under the evidence of debt, deed of trust, or other lien being foreclosed; and

Reasonable attorney fees and the costs incurred by the holder or the attorney for the holder in enforcing the evidence of debt, the deed of trust, or other lien being foreclosed or in defending, protecting, and insuring the holder’s interest in the foreclosed property or any improvements on the property, including but not limited to:

All expenses actually incurred by the officer conducting the sale, publication costs, statutory notice costs and postage, and appraisal fees;

Any general or special taxes or ditch or water assessments levied or accruing against the property and any governmental or quasi-governmental lien, fine, penalty, or assessment against the property;

The premiums on any property, casualty, general liability, or title insurance acquired to protect the holder’s interest in the property or improvements on the property;

Sums due on any prior lien or encumbrance on the property, including the portion of an assessment by a homeowners’ association that constitutes a lien prior to the lien being foreclosed; except that any principal that would not have been due in the absence of acceleration shall not be included in the sum due unless paid after the expiration of the time to cure the indebtedness pursuant to this article;

If the property is subject to a lease, all sums due under the lease;

The reasonable costs and expenses of defending, protecting, securing, and maintaining and repairing the property and the holder’s interest in the property or the improvements on the property, receiver’s fees and expenses, inspection fees, court costs, attorney fees, and fees and costs of the attorney in the employment of the owner of the evidence of debt;

Costs and expenses made pursuant to a valid order from a court of competent jurisdiction to bring the property and the improvements on the property into compliance with the federal, state, county, and local laws, ordinances, and regulations affecting the property, the improvements on the property, or the use of the property; and

Other costs and expenses that may be permitted by the deed of trust, mortgage, or other lien securing the debt or that may be authorized by a court of competent jurisdiction.

As used in this subsection (3), “holder” means the holder of the certificate of purchase, the holder of the certificate of redemption, or the holder of the evidence of debt.

In the case of a redemption, the fees and costs listed in subsection (3) of this section that the holder of the certificate of purchase or certificate of redemption has paid or incurred as of the time of filing of the statement for redemption are allowable and shall be included in the statement of redemption if such amounts have not been included in a prior bid or statement of redemption.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (1), (3), and (4) of this section, a holder of an evidence of debt, certificate of purchase, or certificate of redemption shall not accept from a provider of services or products related to property inspection, broker’s price opinion, title report, appraisal, insurance, repair, or maintenance or from an agent or affiliate of the provider any payment, benefit, or remuneration of any kind, whether in the form of cash, employee, advertising, computer program or service, bank deposit, or other good or service in connection with a foreclosure in which a property inspection, broker’s price opinion, title report, appraisal, insurance, repair, or maintenance service or product of the provider or an agent or affiliate of the provider was used, unless the total value of all payment, benefit, or remuneration received by the holder from the provider of the service or product is shown and credited against amounts owed to the holder in each bid, cure statement, or redemption statement.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1659, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2001:

(2) amended, p. 1068, § 4, effective September 1.

L. 2005:

(2) amended, p. 398, § 4, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1455, § 13, effective January 1, 2008.

Editor’s note:

(1) This section is similar to former § 38-37-119, as it existed prior to 1990.

(2) The effective date for amendments made to this section by chapter 305, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2006, was changed from July 1, 2007, to January 1, 2008, by section 27 of chapter 404, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2007. (See L. 2007, p. 1849.)

38-38-108.
Date of sale.

Whenever property is to be sold following the foreclosure of any deed of trust or other lien by the officer, the initial date of sale shall be:

In the case of a sale of property by the public trustee that is not agricultural property, no less than one hundred ten calendar days nor more than one hundred twenty-five calendar days after the date of recording of the notice of election and demand;

In the case of a sale of property by the sheriff that is not agricultural property, no less than one hundred ten calendar days after the date of the recording of the lis pendens;

In the case of a sale of property by the public trustee, all of which is agricultural property, no less than two hundred fifteen calendar days nor more than two hundred thirty calendar days after the date of recording of the notice of election and demand; or

In the case of a sale of property by the sheriff, all of which is agricultural property, no less than two hundred fifteen calendar days after the date of the recording of the lis pendens.

If it is not evident from the legal description contained in the deed of trust or other lien being foreclosed whether the property described therein is agricultural property, the officer shall make that determination no less than ten calendar days nor more than twenty calendar days after the recording of the notice of election and demand; except that the officer may make the determination at any earlier time upon presentation of acceptable evidence that the property is not agricultural property. The officer shall accept the following as evidence that the property is not agricultural property:

A certified copy of the subdivision plat containing the property or any portion thereof recorded in the office of the clerk and recorder of the county where the property or any portion thereof is located; or

A written statement by the clerk of the city, town, or city and county, dated no more than six months before the date of filing of the notice of election and demand or lis pendens with the officer, that all or a portion of the property was located within the incorporated limits of the city, town, or city and county as of the date of recording of the deed of trust or other lien or as of the date of the statement.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2016.)

(I.5)

The officer shall accept, as evidence that the property is agricultural property, a written statement by the assessor of the county where the property is located, dated no more than six months before the date of filing of the notice of election and demand or lis pendens with the officer, that all of the property was valued and assessed as agricultural property after the date of the recording of the deed of trust or as of the date of the statement.

The officer’s determination of whether the property is agricultural or nonagricultural property shall be binding and may be relied upon by all parties.

The statements described in sub-subparagraph (B) of subparagraph (I) and subparagraph (I.5) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) may be obtained and furnished at the expense of the person seeking the determination of whether the property is agricultural or nonagricultural property, which expense may be included as a portion of the fees and costs of the foreclosure.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to sales following an execution and levy.

Notwithstanding the designation of property valued and assessed as other than agricultural property according to the definition of “agricultural property” in section 38-38-100.3 (1)(c), an assessor’s nonintegral classification of two acres or less of land on which a residential improvement is located, as described in section 39-1-102 (1.6)

of subsection (2) of this section.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1660, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1457, § 14, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2007:

(2)(a)(I)(C) amended, p. 1835, § 11, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2009:

IP(2)(a)(I) amended,(HB 09-1207), ch. 164, p. 714, § 10, effective September 1.

L. 2016:

(2)(a)(I) and (2)(b) amended and (2)(a)(I.5) and (4) added,(HB 16-1339), ch. 346, p. 1410, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor’s note:

(1) This section is similar to former § 38-39-117, as it existed prior to 1990.

(2) The effective date for amendments made to this section by chapter 305, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2006, was changed from July 1, 2007, to January 1, 2008, by section 27 of chapter 404, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2007. (See L. 2007, p. 1849.)

38-38-109.
Continuance of sale - effect of bankruptcy - withdrawal of sale.

Continuance.

For any reason deemed by the officer to be good cause or upon written request by the holder of the evidence of debt or by the attorney for the holder, at any time before commencement of the sale, the officer may continue the sale to a later date by making, at the time and place designated for the sale, an oral announcement of the time and place of such continuance, or by posting or providing a notice of the continuance at the time and place designated for the sale, which shall include the time and place to which the sale is continued. Except as provided in subparagraph (I) of paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section, a sale that is not held on the then-scheduled date of sale and is not continued from the then-scheduled date of sale pursuant to this paragraph (a) shall be deemed to have been continued for a period of one week, and from week to week thereafter in like manner, until the sale is held or otherwise continued pursuant to this paragraph (a). No sale shall be continued to a date later than twelve months from the originally designated date in the combined notice, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

At the request of the holder of the evidence of debt or the attorney for the holder or upon the officer’s own initiative, the officer shall correct any errors in a published combined notice and shall continue the then-scheduled date of sale to a future date within the period of continuance allowed by paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) to permit a corrected combined notice to be published or the original combined notice to be republished pursuant to section 38-38-103 (5). If the officer failed to publish the combined notice as required by section 38-38-103 (5), the officer shall continue the then-scheduled date of sale to a future date within the period of continuance allowed by paragraph (a) of this subsection (1). The future date of sale to which the sale is continued pursuant to this paragraph (b) shall be no later than thirty calendar days after the fifth publication of the corrected combined notice or republished combined notice. The officer shall mail a copy of the combined notice, or corrected combined notice if the original combined notice was erroneous, to the persons and addresses on the most recent amended mailing list no later than ten calendar days after the first correct publication or republication and no less than forty-five calendar days prior to the actual date of sale in the same manner as set forth in section 38-38-103. If there is no amended mailing list, the officer shall mail a copy of the combined notice, or corrected combined notice if the original combined notice was erroneous, to the persons as set forth in the mailing list.

If a cure statement is not timely filed, the sale will be continued pursuant to section 38-38-104 (7).
(c) (I) (A) If a cure statement is not timely filed, the sale will be continued pursuant to section 38-38-104 (7).

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (HB 09-1207), ch. 164, p. 715, § 11, effective January 1, 2010.)

Repealed.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (HB 09-1207), ch. 164, p. 715, § 11, effective January 1, 2010.)

When the property is to be sold by the sheriff, if the cure statement is not filed with the sheriff by 12 noon on the seventh calendar day before the last date of sale permitted under paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), the foreclosure action shall be deemed dismissed, and the holder of the evidence of debt or the attorney for the holder shall file a motion to dismiss with the court. Upon good cause shown, the holder or the attorney for the holder may file a motion with the court requesting further relief as the court may deem necessary or appropriate in the circumstances. The sheriff shall record the order of dismissal or other order of the court and collect all fees and costs actually incurred by the sheriff.

Effect of bankruptcy proceedings.

If all publications of the combined notice prescribed by section 38-38-103 (5) or 13-56-201 (1), C.R.S., have been completed before a bankruptcy petition has been filed that automatically stays the officer from conducting the sale, the officer shall announce, post, or provide notice of that fact on the then-scheduled date of sale, take no action at the then-scheduled sale, and allow the sale to be automatically continued from week to week in accordance with paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section unless otherwise requested in writing prior to any such date of sale by the holder of the evidence of debt or the attorney for the holder.

If the publications of the combined notice prescribed by section 38-38-103 (5) or 13-56-201 (1), C.R.S., have not been started or if all the publications have not been completed before the day a bankruptcy petition has been filed that automatically stays the officer from conducting the sale, the officer shall immediately cancel any remaining publications of the combined notice and, on the date set for the sale, announce, post, or provide a notice that the sale has been enjoined or has been stayed by the automatic stay provisions of the federal bankruptcy code of 1978, title 11 of the United States Code, as amended. The sale shall not be continued under paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section.

Upon the termination of any injunction or upon the entry of a bankruptcy court order dismissing the bankruptcy case, abandoning the property being foreclosed, closing the bankruptcy case, or granting relief from the automatic stay provisions of the federal bankruptcy code of 1978, title 11 of the United States Code, as amended, and upon receipt of a request from the holder of the evidence of debt or the attorney for the holder to restart the action, the public trustee shall rerecord the notice of election and demand and proceed with all additional foreclosure procedures provided by this article 38 as though the foreclosure had just been commenced.

If the request is not received by the public trustee within one year from the date of the termination of any injunction or the entry of a bankruptcy court order dismissing the bankruptcy case, abandoning the property being foreclosed, closing the bankruptcy case, or granting relief from the automatic stay, the foreclosure shall be withdrawn according to subsection (3)(b) of this section.

When the property is to be sold by the sheriff under any statutory or judicial foreclosure or upon execution and levy made pursuant to any court order or decree, upon the notification of termination of any injunction or upon the entry of a bankruptcy court order dismissing the bankruptcy case, abandoning the property being foreclosed, closing the bankruptcy case, or granting relief from the automatic stay provisions of the federal bankruptcy code of 1978, title 11 of the United States Code, as amended, the sheriff shall forthwith establish a new date of sale and republish a new combined notice pursuant to section 13-56-201 (1), C.R.S.

If a sale is held in violation of the automatic stay provisions of the federal bankruptcy code of 1978, title 11 of the United States Code, as amended, and an order is subsequently entered by a bankruptcy court of competent jurisdiction dismissing the bankruptcy, abandoning the property being foreclosed, or closing the bankruptcy case, or an order is subsequently entered granting relief from the automatic stay provided by the federal bankruptcy code, then the evidence of debt, deed of trust, or other lien being foreclosed shall immediately be deemed reinstated, and the deed of trust or other lien shall have the same priority as if the sale had not occurred. Immediately upon reinstatement, the power of sale provided therein, if any, shall be deemed revived.

If the holder of the evidence of debt, deed of trust, or other lien reinstated pursuant to this subsection (2)(c) or the attorney for the holder notifies the officer in writing of the entry of an order dismissing the bankruptcy case, abandoning the property being foreclosed, closing the bankruptcy case, or granting relief from the automatic stay provided by the federal bankruptcy code of 1978, title 11 of the United States Code, as amended, no later than fifty calendar days prior to the last possible sale date pursuant to subsections (1)(a) and (2)(e) of this section, the officer shall set a new date of sale at least twenty-four calendar days but not more than forty-nine calendar days after the date on which the official receives such notice. No later than ten business days after receiving such notice, the officer shall mail an amended combined notice containing the date of the rescheduled sale to each person appearing on the most recent mailing list. No later than twenty calendar days after receiving such notice, but no less than ten calendar days prior to the new date of sale, the officer shall publish the amended combined notice, omitting the copies of the statutes, one time only in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the property is located.

If the holder of the evidence of debt, deed of trust, or other lien reinstated pursuant this subsection (2)(c) or the attorney for the holder does not notify the officer in writing of the entry of an order dismissing the bankruptcy case, abandoning the property being foreclosed, closing the bankruptcy case, or granting relief from the automatic stay provided by the federal bankruptcy code of 1978, title 11 of the United States Code, as amended, within the time allowed under subsection (2)(c)(II) of this section, the officer shall administratively withdraw the sale pursuant to subsection (3)(b) of this section upon receipt of the order dismissing the bankruptcy case, abandoning the property being foreclosed, closing the bankruptcy case, or granting relief from the automatic stay provided by the federal bankruptcy code of 1978, title 11 of the United States Code, as amended.

All fees and costs of providing and publishing the amended combined notice and publication shall be part of the foreclosure costs.

If a sale is set aside by court order, unless the court order specifies otherwise, the following procedures apply:

Upon receipt of the court order, the public trustee’s fee specified in section 38-37-104 (1)(b)(XI), and the costs of recording the court order as specified in this subsection (2)(d), the public trustee shall attach to the order a copy of the certificate of purchase, any assignments thereof, and, if applicable, the confirmation deed, each marked “null and void”, and record the order together with these documents.

Upon recordation of the court order, the certificate of purchase shall be deemed canceled as if the sale had not occurred, and the evidence of debt and deed of trust are deemed fully reinstated with the same lien priority as if the sale had not occurred.

Within ten calendar days after receipt of all documents, fees, and costs specified in this subsection (2)(d), the public trustee shall mail a copy of the court order to each person entitled to receive the combined notice pursuant to section 38-38-103.

After the recording of the court order, the holder of the evidence of debt or the holder’s assignee or the attorney for the holder or the attorney for the assignee may notify the public trustee in writing to reschedule the sale within one year of the issuance of the order. The public trustee shall set a new date of sale at least thirty calendar days but not more than forty-five calendar days after the date on which the public trustee receives notice to schedule a new date of sale subject to the requirements of subsections (1)(a) and (2)(e) of this section, but not earlier than the scheduled sale date as of the date of the court order.

No later than ten calendar days after receiving notice to schedule a new date of sale, the public trustee shall mail a combined notice setting forth the rescheduled date of sale to each person entitled to receive the combined notice pursuant to section 38-38-103.

No later than twenty calendar days after receiving notice to schedule a new date of sale, but no less than ten calendar days prior to the new date of sale, the public trustee shall publish the sale one time only. Such publication must be in the format specified for publication by section 38-38-103.

All fees and costs of the public trustee for actions performed under this section and the cost of recording the court order and documents incorporated into the court order by attachment are part of the foreclosure costs.

After a sale has been set aside and subsequently rescheduled pursuant to this subsection (2)(d)(IV), the sale may be continued in accordance with subsections (1)(a) and (2)(e) of this section.

If a written request to reschedule the sale is not received by the public trustee within one year of the issuance of the order, the foreclosure must be withdrawn according to subsection (3)(b) of this section.

Nothing in this section prevents the foreclosing lender from seeking a rescission of sale pursuant to section 38-38-113 if the requirements within section 38-38-113 (1) are met.

The periods for which a sale may be continued under this subsection (2) shall be in addition to the twelve-month period of continuance provided by subsection (1) of this section.

Withdrawal.

If the holder of the evidence of debt or the attorney for the holder files with the public trustee, prior to sale, a written withdrawal of the notice of election and demand, the foreclosure proceedings shall terminate. The public trustee shall record the withdrawal and collect all fees and costs owed and incurred, including a withdrawal fee in the amount authorized by section 38-37-104 (1)(b)(V).

If there is no sale and if a withdrawal is not filed within forty-five calendar days after the last date of sale permitted by law, the public trustee may transmit by mail or electronic transmission to the attorney for the holder of the evidence of debt, or if no attorney then to the holder, a notice that a withdrawal of the notice of election and demand may be recorded by the public trustee unless a response requesting that such withdrawal be delayed for ninety calendar days is received by the public trustee within thirty calendar days after the date the public trustee’s notice is transmitted. If such response is received by the public trustee and there is no sale nor is a withdrawal filed within the ninety-day delay, the public trustee may record a withdrawal of the notice of election and demand. If no such response is received by the public trustee within thirty calendar days after the notice is transmitted, the public trustee may record a withdrawal of the notice of election and demand at any time after the expiration of such thirty-day notice period. If a withdrawal is recorded during the pendency of an automatic stay imposed on the sale based on any proceeding filed under the federal bankruptcy code of 1978, title 11 of the United States Code, as amended, the withdrawal shall be void and of no force and effect, and the public trustee shall mail to all persons on the mailing list a notice that the withdrawal of the notice of election and demand occurred during the pendency of an injunction or bankruptcy stay and is void and of no force and effect. The public trustee shall cause the notice to be recorded in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county where the property described in the notice is located. All unpaid fees and costs owed and incurred by the public trustee, as well as a withdrawal fee in the amount authorized by section 38-37-104 (1)(b)(VI), shall be paid by the holder. The amount due shall accrue interest at the rate provided by law. Until all amounts due and owing are paid, the public trustee shall be entitled to hold all documentation in the public trustee’s possession and to withhold all other services requested by the holder or the attorney for the holder with respect to the deed of trust or other lien being foreclosed.

The third sentence in subsection (3)(b) was inadvertently omitted from section 11 of House Bill 09-1207; however, it has been restored in the statutes in order to reflect the intent of the general assembly.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1660, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 92:

(2) and (4) amended and (5) added, p. 2091, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1) amended, p. 1108, § 53, effective May 31.

L. 2002:

(4)(a) and IP(4)(b)(I) amended, p. 1341, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(3)(b) and (3)(c) amended, p. 1206, § 84, effective August 4.

L. 2005:

(1), (2), and (3)(a) amended, p. 398, § 5, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1458, § 15, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2007:

(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c)(I)(B), and (2) amended, p. 1835, § 12, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2009:

(1)(c)(I)(C) added,(HB 09-1276), ch. 404, p. 2221, § 3, effective June 2; (1)(b), (1)(c), (2)(b)(I), (2)(d), and (3)(b) amended,(HB 09-1207), ch. 164, p. 715, § 11, effective January 1, 2010; (1)(c)(I)(C) amended,(SB 09-292), ch. 369, p. 1986, § 132, effective January 1, 2010.

L. 2012:

(2)(b) amended,(SB 12-030), ch. 96, p. 321, § 9, effective September 1.

L. 2016:

(1)(c)(I)(C) repealed,(SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 792, § 104, effective June 6.

L. 2018:

(2)(b)(II), (2)(c), and (2)(d) amended,(HB 18-1254), ch. 138, p. 906, § 5, effective August 8.

Editor’s note:

(1) This section is similar to former § 38-39-115, as it existed prior to 1990.

(2) The effective date for amendments made to this section by chapter 305, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2006, was changed from July 1, 2007, to January 1, 2008, by section 27 of chapter 404, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2007. (See L. 2007, p. 1849.)

(3) Amendments to subsection (1)(c) by House Bill 09-1207, House Bill 09-1276, and Senate Bill 09-292 were harmonized.